Florida, session 2026, SB76.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âSection 491.023, Florida Statutes, is created to 25 read: 26 491.023âSocial Work Licensure Interstate Compact; public 27 records and meetings exemptions.â 28 (1)âA social workerâs personal identifying information, 29 other than the social workerâs name, licensure status, or 30 licensure number, obtained from the data system, as described in 31 Art. XI of s. 491.022, and held by the department or the board 32 is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 33 Constitution unless the state that originally reported the 34 information to the data system authorizes the disclosure of such 35 information by law. If disclosure is so authorized, such 36 information may be disclosed only to the extent authorized by 37 the law of the reporting state. 38 (2)(a)âA meeting or a portion of a meeting of the Social 39 Work Licensure Compact Commission or the executive committee or 40 other committee of the commission, established in Art. X of s. 41 491.022, at which matters specifically exempted from disclosure 42 by federal or state law are discussed is exempt from s. 286.011 43 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the State Constitution. 44 (b)âRecordings, minutes, and records generated during an 45 exempt meeting or portion of such a meeting are exempt from s. 46 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 47 (3)âThis section is subject to the Open Government Sunset 48 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 49 on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 50 through reenactment by the Legislature. 51 Section 2.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 52 necessity that a social workerâs personal identifying 53 information, other than the social workerâs name, licensure 54 status, or licensure number, obtained from the data system, as 55 described in Article XI of s. 491.022, Florida Statutes, and 56 held by the Department of Health or the Board of Clinical Social 57 Work, Marriage and Family Therapy, and Mental Health Counseling 58 be made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 59 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. Protection of such 60 information is required under the Social Work Licensure 61 Interstate Compact, which a state must adopt in order to become 62 a member state of the compact. Without the public records 63 exemption, this state will be unable to effectively implement 64 and administer the compact. 65 (2)(a)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public necessity 66 that any meeting of the Social Work Licensure Compact Commission 67 or the executive committee or other committee of the commission 68 held as provided in s. 491.022, Florida Statutes, in which 69 matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or 70 state law are discussed be made exempt from s. 286.011, Florida 71 Statutes, and s. 24(b), Article I of the State Constitution. 72 (b)âThe Social Work Licensure Interstate Compact requires 73 the closure of any meeting, or any portion of a meeting, of the 74 Social Work Licensure Compact Commission or the executive 75 committee or other committee of the commission if the presiding 76 officer announces in a public meeting that, in connection with 77 the performance of the commissionâs duties, the commission must 78 discuss certain sensitive and confidential subject matters. In 79 the absence of a public meetings exemption, this state would be 80 prohibited from becoming a member state of the compact. 81 (3)âThe Legislature also finds that it is a public 82 necessity that the recordings, minutes, and records generated 83 during a meeting held as provided in s. 491.022, Florida 84 Statutes, which is exempt from public meetings requirements be 85 made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), 86 Article I of the State Constitution. Release of such information 87 would negate the public meetings exemption. As such, the 88 Legislature finds that the public records exemption is a public 89 necessity. 90 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 91 SB 74 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 92 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 93 thereof and becomes a law.